Washington statutes.
RCW 9.08.030

False certificate of registration of animals—False representation as to breed.

Every person who, by color or aid of any false pretense, representation, token or writing shall obtain from any club, association, society or company for the improvement of the breed of cattle, horses, sheep, swine, fowls or other domestic animals or birds, a certificate of registration of any animal or bird in a herdbook, or other register of any such association, society or company, or a transfer of any such registration, and every person who shall knowingly represent an animal or bird for breeding purposes to be of a greater degree of any particular strain of blood than such animal actually possesses, shall be guilty of a gross misdemeanor.

[ 1909 c 249 s 341; RRS s 2593.]